apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="plums__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pröjsar/e__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ok__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fjällpansar__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gelé__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kärande__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bott/en__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nens</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nars</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narna</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narnas</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gomben">          <i>gomben</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sökande">         <i>sökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="standar">         <i>standar</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="resande">         <i>resande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nödrop">          <i>nödrop</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="jourhavande">     <i>jourhavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="genkärande">      <i>genkärande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="arbetssökande">   <i>arbetssökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="upprymningsstål"> <i>upprymningsstål</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mötesordförande"> <i>mötesordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kallbad">         <i>kallbad</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kommunalordförande"><i>kommunalordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kafferspråk">     <i>kafferspråk</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="handlande">       <i>handlande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="örngott">         <i>örngott</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="inkomstslag">     <i>inkomstslag</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mumsmums">        <i>mumsmums</i><par n="plums__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="ök">              <i>ök</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kommunalråd">     <i>kommunalråd</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stenhallon">      <i>stenhallon</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gårdfarihandlande"><i>gårdfarihandlande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="plums">           <i>plums</i><par n="plums__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="kolon">           <i>kolon</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="daghavande">      <i>daghavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="singelspel">      <i>singelspel</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="benvärmare">      <i>benvärmar</i><par n="pröjsar/e__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="handelsresande">  <i>handelsresande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fördrag">         <i>fördrag</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="åldersbetyg">     <i>åldersbetyg</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kärande">         <i>kärande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gull">            <i>gull</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="besökande">       <i>besökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pröjsare">        <i>pröjsar</i><par n="pröjsar/e__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="svarande">        <i>svarande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="särkullbarn">     <i>särkullbarn</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="forskningsresande"><i>forskningsresande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="partiordförande"> <i>partiordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="materialproblem"> <i>materialproblem</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fjällpansar">     <i>fjällpansar</i><par n="fjällpansar__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="frisyrgelé">      <i>frisyrgelé</i><par n="gelé__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="gelé">            <i>gelé</i><par n="gelé__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="ögonbotten">      <i>ögonbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tårtbotten">      <i>tårtbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="resonansbotten">  <i>resonansbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dubbelbotten">    <i>dubbelbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dalbotten">       <i>dalbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sjöbotten">       <i>sjöbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sandbotten">      <i>sandbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fartygsbotten">   <i>fartygsbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="buteljbotten">    <i>buteljbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blindbotten">     <i>blindbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klangbotten">     <i>klangbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bräken">          <i>bräk</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="selleribotten">   <i>selleribott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stenbotten">      <i>stenbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="taggbräken">      <i>taggbräk</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="örnbräken">       <i>örnbräk</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kammarkollegium"> <i>kammarkollegi</i><par n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt"/></e>
